 
 
Examples of falsification of history
 
 
Throughout the course of history the description of history has been "modified" to suit the perception or interests of certain people or groups of people. The link below gives but one example, but a topical one:

 http://www.bondle.co.uk/personal_pages/jon/maxim/ 

Have you any other juicy examples, that I might use in teaching to support the point made above  
 
 
Re: Examples of falsification of history

 
Have you any other juicy examples, that I might use in teaching to support the point made above
 

at present not

not only Sir Hiram Stevens Maxim was the first, also a German. But I don´t know his name currently
 
 
The obvious one is American schools basically teaching that Christopher Columbus discovered the Americas, which later became named for Vespucci, even though we of course know that neither man was there first! They weren't even the first "explorers" there.
 
 
of course not

the first was the vikings
 
 
Re: Examples of falsification of history

 
not only Sir Hiram Stevens Maxim was the first, also a German. But I don´t know his name currently
 

Perhaps you refer to Otto Lilienthal, but he used a glider, that doesn't count as powered flight. There was also a French engineer who made a jump in a steam driven flying machine, but I can't remember his name.
 
 
Mmm... can think of a few off the top of my head.

1) George Washington cutting down the cherry tree and saying "I cannot tell a lie". This was a literary invention of Mason Weems.

2) Kwanzaa was a holiday invented in 1966 by Karenga, a promonent black nationalist, and does not have the historical background in Africa.

3) Dian Fossey (Gorillas of the Mist basis), was pretty warped in the head. She is documented as having cut off the hands of poachers and mailing them to their boss, much like they did to gorillas. Funny how they leave that out.

4) Sydney Schanberg won a Pulitzer Prize for his dispatches from Cambodia. He worked with Dith Pran. According to some textbooks (America's Past and Promise for one), Sydney is not even mentioned.

5) Any book written by Glencoe. Glencoe is a history book writer for our schools today. His books are riddled with falsehoods and blantant lies. America was the first to treat slaves as sub-human? Shoot, I can go on for pages on just him.

6) Before Columbus discovered America, Europe thought the world was flat. Ha! Greeks figured that one out in 300 BC and appeared in Aristotle's writings.

7) Maps in text books show Russia in 1300 AD. However, the name Rusisa was never utilized until 1721 by Peter the Great.

8) Lincoln's cabin that he built with his own hands was made 30 years after his death.

The federal program for erecting national subject-matter standards collapsed during 1995 and was formally abolished in 1996. The text books that are written today are complete and utter garbage. I can keep going on this subject all you want.
 
 
bit off topic but funny
I found this compilation on the Web. It is a "history of the world" collected by teachers throughout the United States, from eighth grade pupils through college level students. Read carefully, and you will learn a lot of incorrect historical information. Some parts are hysterical rather than historical  

The inhabitants of ancient Egypt were called mummies. They lived in the Sarah Dessert and traveled by Camelot. The climate of the Sarah is such that the inhabitants have to live elsewhere, so areas of the dessert are cultivated by irritation. The Egyptians built the Pyramids in the shape of a huge triangular cube. The Pyramids are a range of mountains between France and Spain.

The Bible is full of interesting caricatures. In the first book of the Bible, Guinesses, Adam and Eve were created from an apple tree. On of their children, Cain, once asked, "Am I my brother's son?" God asked Abraham to sacrifice Isaac on Mount Montezuma. Jacob, son of Isaac, stole his brother's birth mark. Jacob was a patriarch who brought up his twelve sons to be patriarchs, but they did not take it. One of Jacob's sons, Joseph, gave refuse to the Israelites.

Pharaoh forced the Hebrew slaves to make bread without straw. Moses led them to the Red Sea, where they made unleavened bread, which is bread made without any ingredients. Afterwards, Moses went up on Mount Cyanide to get the ten commandments. David was a Hebrew king skilled at playing the liar. He fought with the Philatelists, a race of people who lived in the Biblical times. Soloman, one of David's sons, had 500 wives and 500 porcupines.

Without the Greeks we wouldn't have history. The Greeks invented three kinds of columns - Corinthian, Doric, and Ironic. They also had myths. A myth is a female moth. One myth says that the mother of Achilles dipped him in the River Stynx until he became intollerable. Achilles appears in The Iliad, by Homer. Homer also wrote The Oddity, in which Penelope was the last hardship that Ulysses endured on his journey. Actually, Homer was not written by Homer but by another man of that name.

Socrates was a famous Greek teacher who went around giving people advice. They killed him. Socrates died from an overdose of wedlock.

In the Olympic games, Greeks ran races, jumped, hurled the biscuits, the threw the java. The reward to the victor was a coral wreath. The government of Athens was democratic because people took the law into their own hands. There were no wars in Greece, as the mountains were so high that they couldn't climb over to see what their neighbors were doing. When they fought with the Persians, the Greeks were outnumbered because the Persians had more men.

Eventually, the Ramons conquered the Greeks. History calls people Romans because they never stayed in one place for very long. At Roman banquets, the guests wore garlic in their hair. Julius Caesar extinguished himself on the battlefields of Gaul. The Ides of March murdered him because they thought he was going to be made king. Nero was a cruel tyranny who would turture his poor subjects by playing the fiddle to them.

Then came the Middle Ages. King Alfred conquered the Dames. King Arthur lived in the Age of Shivery, King Harold mustarded his troops before the Battle of Hastings, Joan of Arc was canonized by Bernard Shaw, and victims of the Black Death grew boobs on their necks. Finally, Magna Carta provided that no free man should be hanged twice for the same offense.

In medevil time most of the people were alliterate. The greatest writer of the time was Chaucer, who wrote many poems and versus and also wrote literature. Another tale tells of William Tell, who shot an arrow through an apple while standing on his son's head.

The Renaissance was an age in which more individuals felt the value of their human being. Martin Luther was nailed to the church door at Wittenberg for selling papal indulgences. He died a horrible death, being excommunicated by a bull. It was the painter Donatello's interes in the female nude that made him the father of the Renaissance. It was an age of great inventions and discoveries. Gutenberg invented the Bible. Sir Walter Raleigh is a historical figure because he invented cigarettes. Another important invention was the circulation of blood. Sir Francis Drake circumcised the world with a 100 foot clipper.

The government of England was a limited mockery. Henry VIII found walking difficult because he had an abbess on his knee. Queen Elizabeth was the "Virgin Queen." As a queen she was a success. When Elizabeth exposed herself before her troops, they all shouted, "hurrah." Then her navy went out and defeated the Spanish Armadillo.

The greatest write of the Renaissance was William Shakespear. Shakespear never made much money and is only famous because of his plays. He lived at Windsor with his merry wives, writing tragedies, comedies and errors. In one of Shakespear's famous plays, Hamlet rations out his situation by relieving himself in a long soliloquy. In another, Lady Macbeth tried to convince Macbeth to kill the Kind by attack his manhood. Romeo and Juliet are an example of a heroic couplet. Writing at the same time as Shakespear was Miguel Cervantes. He wrote Donkey Hote. The next great author was John Milton. Milton wrote Paradise Lost. Then his wife died and he wrote Paradise Regained.

During the Renaissance America began. Christopher Columbus was a great navigator who discovered America while cursing about the Atlantic. His ships were called the Nina, the Pinta, and the Santa Fe. Later, the Pilgrims crossed the Ocean, and this was known as Pilgrims Progress. When they landed at Plymouth Rock, they were greeted by the Indians, who came down the hill rolling their war hoops before them. The Indian squabs carried porpoises on their back. Many of the Indian heroes were killed, along with their cabooses, which proved very fatal for them. The winter of 1620 was a hard one for the settlers. Many people died and many babies were born. Captain John Smith was responsible for all this.

One of the causes of the Revolutionary Wars was the English put tacks in their tea. Also, the colonists would send their parcels through the post without stamps. During the War, the Red Coats and Paul Revere was throwing balls over stone walls. The dogs were barking and the peacocks crowing. Finally, the colonists won the War and no longer had to pay for taxis.

Delegates from the original thirteen states formed the Contented Congress. Thomas Jefferson, a Virgin, and Benjamin Franklin were two singers of the Declaration of Independence. Franklin had gone to Boston carrying all his clothes in his pocket and a loaf of bread under each arm. He invented electricity by rubbing two cats backwards and declared, "A horse devided against itself cannot stand." Franklin died in 1790 and is still dead.

George Washington married Martha Curtis and in due time became the Father of Our Country. Then the Constitution of the United States was adopted to secure domestic hostility. Under the Constitution the people enjoyed the right to keep bare arms.

Abraham Lincoln became America's greatest president. Lincoln's mother died in infancy, and he was born in a log cabin which he built with his own hands. When Lincoln was President, he wore only a tall silk hat. He said, "In onion there is strength." Abraham Lincoln wrote the Gettysburg address while traveling from Washington to Gettysburg on the back of an envelope. He also freed the slaves by signing the Emasculation Proclamation, and the Fourteenth Amendment gave the ex-Negroes citizenship. But the Clue Clux Clan would torcher and lynch the ex-Negroes and other innocent victims. It claimed it represented law and odor. On the night of April 14, 1865, Lincoln went to the theater and got shot in his seat by one of the actors in a moving picture show. The believed assinator was John Wilkes Booth, a supposingly insane actor. This ruined Booth's career.

Meanwhile in Europe, the enlightenment was a reasonable time. Voltare invented electricity and also wrote a book called Candy. Graity was invented by Isaac Walton. It is chiefly noticeable in the Autumn, when the apples are falling off trees.

Bach was the most famous composer in the world, and so was Handel. Handel was half German, half Italian, and half English. He was very large. Bach died from 1750 to the present. Beethoven wrote music even though he was deaf. He was so deaf he wrote loud music. He took long walks in the forest even when everyone was calling for him. Beethoven expired in 1827 and later died for this.

France was in a very serious state. The French Revolution was accomplished before it happened. The Marseillaise was the theme song of the French Revolution, and it catapulted into Napoleon. During the Napoleonic Wars, the crowned heads of Europe were trembling in their shoes. The the Spanish gorillas came down from the hills and nipped at Napoleon's flanks. Napoleon became ill with bladder problems and was very tense and unrestrained. He wanted an heir to inherit his power, but since Josephine was a baroness, she couldn't bear children.

The sun never set on the British Empire because the British Empire is in the East and the sun sets in the West. Queen Victoria was the longest queen. She sat on a thorn for 63 years. Her reclining years and finally the end of her life were exemplary of a great personality. Her death was the final event which ended her reign.

The nineteenth century was a time of many great inventions and thoughts. The invention of the steamboat caused a network of rivers to spring up. Cyrus McCormick invented the McCormick raper, which did the work of hundred men. Samuel Morse invented a code of telepathy. Louis Pasteur discovered a cure for rabbis. Charles Darwin was a naturalist who wrote the Organ of the Species

And then Bush was illicited president.
 
 
 
 http://www.bondle.co.uk/personal_pages/jon/maxim/ 

Have you any other juicy examples, that I might use in teaching to support the point made above  
 

You can use your own example two ways. First to demonstrate that there were powered flights prior to the Wright Bros.. and secondly to show that the site itself is advancing it's own bit of historical revisionism. Most of the authorative sites on the Wright Bros. credit them with the first "controlled flight" - not the absolute first flight.
 
 
Thanks TLomon for your examples. I am aware that some US history textbooks are riddled with errors; as in "Napoleon won the batlle of Waterloo" and "President Eisenhower landed in Normandy on D-day". Now I know that there is no standards commission overseeing their content. Still, I find it difficult to understand how such monumental errors can slip by.

By the way, the French aviation pioneer I meant was Clément Ader who made his first "flight" in 1886. He is remembered for his verified 300 meter flight on October 14, 1897. (He is also remembered as a lousy pilot for he crashed all his prototypes)

This is a good example of each major power of the time claims the father of powered heavier than air flight to be one of their nationals.

Another example is the invention of the printing press. Gutenberg gets the credit, but the Dutch claim that their Coster was earlier (and that Gutenberg's later employee Fust stole the secret). However, the Belgians put forward Brito, France has Waldfoghel, the Italians throw Castaldi around and the British stick with Caxton. Unfortunately for all these 15th century gentlemen, movable type printing was already used in Korea in 1041 AD by Pi Cheng...
 
 
Here's a list of historic falsifications I gathered from a Dutch book called 'Encyclopedie van misvattingen' - Encyclopedia of misconceptions.

1 ) It is defendable that NOT George Washington, but John Hanson was the first president of the United States of America. The US gained independence in 1776. The Charter for the Confederation (I don't know the exact translation) was formulated a year later (1777), and ratified by several states in 1781. According to the Charter a Congress should be formed, and this organ chose John Hanson as 'president of the United States'. Because of illness though, Hanson had to give up his position a year later. Now, as I said, it is defendable that Hanson was the first president of the US, but on the other hand, he didn't have the same powers as George Washington had after the acceptance of the American constitution in 1789.

2 ) It is often believed Rome was build on seven hills. Though there are numerous sources which speak of eight hills, as well as six hills. Now, the fact that people believe it was build on seven hills was because of a feast, celebrated in Rome, called 'Septimontium'. It was believed Septimontium could be translated as seven hills, but according to A. Claridge, writer of Rome: an Oxford archaeological guide (Oxford 1998), Septimontium could also have been derived from 'fortified hills'.

3 ) Julius Caesar wasn't an emperor ; he was a dictator. The fact that a word like czar is derived from Ceasar, as being emperor, is incorrect.

4 ) The last words of Julius Ceasar weren't 'Et tu, Brute'. The first time these words were mentioned was in the 16th century by an anonymous play writer in a play called 'True tragedy of Richard Duke of Yorke'. The origin of these words could lie in a report by a history writer called Suetonius in De vita Caesarum, in which the writer says the last words of Ceasar: 'Kai su, teknon!' (Yes, Old Greek), which means 'You too, son' - son as in Brute, because Suetonius says Caesar saw Brute as his unlawful son. HOWEVER, Suetonius says he only got these words from someone else - it's not that Suetonius was there when Caesar was murdered. And we should also keep in mind that 'Kai su' was often used in Greek tragedies, and that it could also mean 'Get lost', instead off 'You too'.

5 ) Jeanne d'Arc is used as a French symbol of liberty. However, is Jeanne d'Arc really French, and was she a real farm girl? NO and NO. Jeanne d'Arc was born in Domrémy, Lorraine, which wasn't part of France in that time. And she was not born in a poor family of farmers, but in a considerable wealthy family - her father was co-owner of a local castle, and one of the most important persons in Domrémy.

That would be it for now. Next time: the truth about Native Americans, Magalhaes, Martin Luther, cowboys and Hitler.
 
 
Re: Examples of falsification of history

 
Throughout the course of history the description of history has been "modified" to suit the perception or interests of certain people or groups of people. The link below gives but one example, but a topical one:

 http://www.bondle.co.uk/personal_pages/jon/maxim/ 

Have you any other juicy examples, that I might use in teaching to support the point made above  
 

Fishin' is correct: The Wright brothers are credited with having achieved the first controlled powered flight. The Maxim machine (if it ever left the ground on its own power -- the web page is rather vague on that point) sounds more like it achieved an uncontrolled crash rather than a controlled flight.

Certainly, if the only object was to put an engine on a machine and launch it into the air, that could have been accomplished by the Montgolfier brothers. The Wrights, however, did something that no one else (including Maxim, Lilienthal, Langley, and others) did: get a machine to achieve powered and controlled flight.
 
 
 
7) Maps in text books show Russia in 1300 AD. However, the name Rusisa was never utilized until 1721 by Peter the Great.
 

Petr Alexeevitch Romanov was the fifth Romanov Tsar. Mikhail Romanov was prevailed upon to take the office in 1613. He was succeeded by his son Alexei Mikhailovitch. He was succeeded by Fedor Alexeevitch (Fedor III), who was in turn succeeded by his ten-year old half-brother, Petr Alexeevitch. There was in that same year an uprising by the Streltsy, which resulted in Petr and his older half-brother Ivan Alexeevitch (Ivan V) ruling as "co-tsars," under the regency of Petr's half-sister, and Ivan's sister, Sophia Alexeevna.

At the very least, the title: "Of Great Russia, Little Russia [i.e., the Ukraine] and of all the Russias, Autocrat"--was used from the time of Mikhail in 1613. Although i don't have the resources at hand, i believe that Vasili II was the first ruler, in 1456, to proclaim himself autocrat of Russia. It is certain that his successor, Ivan III, or Grozny Ivan (Ivan the Terrible, more kindly remembered as Ivan the Great), conquered parts of the Ukraine and Kazan, and brought all of "Great" Russia under his control. I rather suspect that it was during his time that the title: "Of Great Russia, etc.... Autocrat" was first introduced--again, i'm at work, so i can't look this up.

What Petr did in 1721 was to proclaim himself Emperor. Technically speaking, all of his successors were Emperors, or Empresses (there were four of these--Catherine, Anne, Elizabeth and Catherine II [Catherine the Great]).

Which is something entirely different from contending that Russia wasn't called Russia until 1721, which contention i contend is without foundation.
 
 
 
1) George Washington cutting down the cherry tree and saying "I cannot tell a lie". This was a literary invention of Mason Weems.
 

That's Parson Weems. I don't know if he was a Mason or not, but even if he was he wouldn't have used that as a title.

EDIT: I just checked. It seems that it was Parson Mason Weems -- I stand self-corrected.

 
7) Maps in text books show Russia in 1300 AD. However, the name Rusisa was never utilized until 1721 by Peter the Great.
 

Depends on whose map you're talking about. I know, from first-hand experience, that pre-1721 German documents routinely referred to "Russland" and French documents referred to "la Russie." The tsars, moreover, claimed to be emperors "of all the Russias" before the reign of Peter the Great.
 
 
 
4 ) The last words of Julius Ceasar weren't 'Et tu, Brute'.
 

Many of the historical "misrepresentations" exposed by these de-bunkers are, in fact, little more than legends or literary embellishments that most self-respecting historians never took seriously. If the general public has been gulled into believing that Julius Caesar actually uttered "et tu, Brute," then that is simply a testament to the public's credulity, not to any falsification of the historical record.
 
 
Re: Examples of falsification of history

 
 
Throughout the course of history the description of history has been "modified" to suit the perception or interests of certain people or groups of people. The link below gives but one example, but a topical one:

 http://www.bondle.co.uk/personal_pages/jon/maxim/ 

Have you any other juicy examples, that I might use in teaching to support the point made above  
 

Fishin' is correct: The Wright brothers are credited with having achieved the first controlled powered flight.
 

Not to be pedantic or anything but the Wright Brothers did not achieve the "first controlled powered flight" either.
 
 
 
Wilbur and Orville Wright
Respectively,
born April 16, 1867, near Millville, Ind., U.S.
died May 30, 1912, Dayton, Ohio

born Aug. 19, 1871, Dayton
died Jan. 30, 1948, Dayton

American brothers, inventors, and aviation pioneers who achieved the first powered, sustained, and controlled airplane flight (1903) and built and flew the first fully practical airplane (1905).
 
source: Britannica
 
 
Walter,

The "first controlled powered flight" was not an airplane.

The Wright brothers made the first powered, sustained and controlled airplane flight.

Their mark was the first heavier-than-air flight of this nature, powered controlled flights predated powered controlled heavier-than-air flights.

For an example of a controlled flight that predated it how about the "driveable" (you should be able to translate that ;-)).
 
 
Re: Examples of falsification of history

 
Not to be pedantic or anything...
 

Then you're going about it the wrong way.
 
 
Re: Examples of falsification of history

 
 
Not to be pedantic or anything...
 

Then you're going about it the wrong way.
 

I know, but pedantry is a big part of the very issue we discuss. For example, Brazilians won't recognize the Wright brothers for their use of a catapult.  

So upon the basis of being the first to achieve a powered, controlled, heavier-than-air flight that did not use a catapult they say Santos Dumont invented it.  
 
 
I had always thought that Harry Truman coined the phrase, "The Buck Stops Here." Interesting what I found about the background and possible meaning of the word, "buck":

 http://dsc.discovery.com/anthology/unsolvedhistory/pigs/mar03/mar03answer.html 
 
 
 
I know, but pedantry is a big part of the very issue we discuss. For example, Brazilians won't recognize the Wright brothers for their use of a catapult.  

So upon the basis of being the first to achieve a powered, controlled, heavier-than-air flight that did not use a catapult they say Santos Dumont invented it.  
 

This is somewhat like the debate over who first discovered the New World. What people forget is that the important part wasn't finding America (someone was bound to stumble across it eventually). The important thing was finding it and getting the Old World to act on that discovery. That's what marks Columbus's achievement as more important than Leif Ericksson's.

In the same way, the important thing wasn't achieving powered, heavier-than-air flight (a Roman candle can do that) but in achieving powered controlled flight. In that respect, the catapult was largely irrelevant, since it has nothing to do with the control aspect of the flight, just the propulsion. Now, if Brazilians take a measure of pride in Santos Dumont's achievements (and they were no small achievements -- Santos Dumont was a very important figure in early aviation), in the same way that Norwegians take pride in the achievements of Leif Ericksson, well, I don't have a problem with that.
 
 
Paaskyden - there is a species of "history war" going on in Australia as we speak.

I will have to return and give you references after work - but, to summarise.

Long ago, little Australians were taught that the Aboriginal people here (if mentioned) pretty much did not resist "settlement" and that their poor state today was the result of culture shock - ie that their culture was overwhelmed by the more advanced one and they were just sort of fading away. Tasmania (which had lost pretty much all its native inhabitants) was given as an archetype of this. It suited thre political climate of the time.

Research was done in the sixties and seventies and eighties - and a new picture emerged - one of resistance and pretty much deliberate genocide - Tasmania was given as an archetype of this. It suited the political climate of the time.

Now - some historians are researching and challenging this view - and countering it - saying that the evidence for massacres and deliberate genocide is very poor and exaggerated. Tasmania is given as an archetype of this. It suits the political climate of this time.

This is real academic and political warfare!

I will be back, and give you some references.
 
 
Oh Our Dear Wabbit...

The accounts of the  early explorers of Austrialia , such as Sturt, Flinders, Bass, Eyre, Kennedy and many, many others, when they survived to give the account, report hostility and violent attacks by the aboriginal inhabitants. A similar pattern seems to me to have played itself out in English-speaking North America, and in those portions of the Americas which the Spanish explored. An initial reaction of the aboriginal inhabitants was either pity for or contempt of the starving, newly-arrived people, whose pale countenances often convinced the aboriginals that they were very ill, even thought this was not necessarily true. Many examples can be adduced in North America of the aboriginals feeding and offering other types of assistance to the first settlers.

However, if the reaction were contempt, and the Jamestown settlement in 1607 in what is now Virginia is a sterling example, the newcomers might be subjected to frequent attack and near constant harrassment. In the example of Jamestown, the newcomers unwittingly chose the shore of the Chesapeake which was inhabited by warrior societies--which circumstance was forced upon those tribes by the active, violent aggression of their relatively recently arrived neighbors, the Potomacs and the Susquehannocks. Those tribes, along with the local tribes, were all competing for the limited resources available, and which had been much reduced both by the rapid increase in aboriginal population as "new" tribes moved south, by the wanton, benighted destruction of some of the ecosystems in the earlier, abortive Spanish colonies in this region, and specifically in the first decade of the 17th century, by a prolonged period of drought. For more than a decade, the Jamestown settlement lost about 90% of its population each year. The constant arrival of new settlers was all that kept the colony populated--and it caused a justified alarm among the aboriginal. As time passed and the Virginia company failed, the Royal government took over the enterprise, and, increasingly, the new arrivals were "yoemen" farmers and itinerant agricultural laborers, who were becoming surplus population in England as the pace of enclusure sped up, and more and more of the rural "peasantry" were thrown out into the road. These people were, however, physically heartier stock than the "gentlemen," and "quasi-gentlemen" who had made up the first colonists of the Viriginia Company. Warfare became more deadly for the aboriginal, and they retaliated with more fury. This eventually lead to the 1622 war, which was general throughout the Tidewater, and for which the debacle at  Martin's Hundred  has become an archetype. More than 20% of the casualties sustained in that summer of war fell among the roughly 150 settlers there.

Commerce was common among the aboriginals of the North American continent, a kind of pack-what-you-can-on-your-back and go walk-about kind of commerce. There is abundant evidence for this in the records of the Hudson's Bay Company, the correspondence and journals of the Jesuits who went out to Thunder Bay and then spread out among the Huron and the Algonquian tribes, and in the correspondence and journals of the Moravian Missionaries (who filtered west out of eastern Pennsylvania, and often moved unmolested even in the midst of raging war, because the Indians became convinced that they were all infected with lunancy [how else explain their suicidal peregrinations?] and therefore sacred and immune). It took very likely less than a generation for almost every band from Hilton Head to Father of Waters to become at least vaguely aware of the arrival of pale-faced people with terrible and murderous magic at their disposal. I find it hard to imagine why anyone would wonder why there was near constant warfare between a set of tribesmen just arriving in a technological age, and a set of tribesmen relatively recently arrived in a Neolithic state. I stronly suspect that someone cleverer than i could make a case from the dispassionately viewed records of the colonization or attempted-colonization of the planet by Europeans that these wars were inevitable, and that "genocide" was often the, sometimes intended, sometimes unintended consequence thereof.

 Samuel de Champlain*  is the father of Quebéc, whether one means the city or the "province" (i personally think nation would be a better term). Champlain rather quickly and readily made friends with the Ottawas, and thereby, the more civilized of the Algonquian tribes (Champlain and La Salle both report that there were Algonquian-speaking tribes living on the rocky shores of the lower (northeastern) banks of the St. Laurent who were primitive savages in comparison to the relatively affluent Algonquian tribes of the Lakes). As a result of this diplomacy, Champlain and three companions soon set out with an Ottawa war party, which had news of an Iroquois war band in the upper Lakes region of what is now New York. The Iroquois, being a politic and sanguinary body by nature, took the grossest umbrage to the conduct of the French, and blamed them fully for their defeat, and the consequent indignity of having their captive warriors tortured eaten by the Ottawa. ( * [/color] The site here linked is of rather dubious value--see for example the account it gives of this fight as compared to what one will find in Parkman--for which what i've written above is a précis... more or less.) There was thereafter, war in every generation between the French and the Iroquois. Even the great  Louis de Baude, Comte de Frontenac  was never free of the menace of their implacable emnity. In the great age of the exploration of the west--which ought to bear the name of  René-Robert-Cavelier, le Sieur de La Salle  --the French spread into what is now the heart of America. People such as  Hennepin  and  le Père Jacques Marquette  all provide a brief lifting of the curtain on that prehistoric time in the lives of the aboriginals. One of La Salle's loyal officers,  Henri de Tonti , recounted the attempt of the Iroquois to exterminate the  Illiniwek  (known to the French as the Illinois). The Iroquois had become so obsessed with the destruction of the French, that they had, in political convocation, determined to engross the fur trade of the Great Lakes through the simple expedient of exterminating the tribes thereof. It was to prove a disaster for all concerned, and for none more than it was for the Iroquois.

I have little doubt that word of the new pale strangers spread very quickly through the last dreamers awakening from the Dream Time in that last decade of the 18th century in Oz. I have little doubt that when Sturt fought aboriginals, the terms of the field and the rules of the game were already in place, with the locals determined to wipe out this new human virus, and virus intent on using just as much gunpowder as it took the make their way across the countryside. Historical truth does not truly exist, but neither is there much truth for us to hang onto in the courses of our lives. We exercise judgment about our contemparies and the human race as it now exists. The evidence of history is no more nor less reliable than the media we now consult, and we all manage to convince ourselves of what we would most fondly care to believe at all events.

"Fadism" in history is about as exciting as, and about as meaningful as, the deepest pyschology of cyclical trends in fashionable clothing. The study of why people come to believe that of which they wished to be convinced, however, is a far more engrossing read than mere shifts and smoking jackets.

(For an enchanting read on the history of the French in North America, see the seven volumes of the 19th century American historian,  Francis Parkman . Modern specialists will have much to carp at--and there is no fuller and no more comprehensive a read on this important and little regarded period in the European history of my native continent. For a grim and rather honest (for aught that i know) account of  The First Fleet  (awfully grim when reduced to a list of names and sentences, no?) and it successors until the end of the penal colony, see  The Fatal Shore , by Robert Hughes, and then be sure to finish the job with  Beyond the Fatal Shore[/i] . To begin to learn something about the aboriginals who fell before this relentless human tide, start with  the Dream Time .

This should not be construed as a statement that the French had a superior or an inferior colonial system to the English. Theirs was radically different than the English. The colonies were under control of the ministre de la Marine, for what was to the French the obvious advantages of having the Navy control enterprises which could only be visited at the end of a long sea voyage. As the centuries long craze in Europe for hats made from beaver felt and the demand for exotic furs deepened, the lure of instant riches through the fur trade was irresistible young officers of the Canadian army (the Marine Ministry maintained a professional force of French troops recruited from the Canadian population--they were largely Basques and Gascognards) and the Royal Navy, and of course the petty officers of government. The corruption eventually became pandemic in society, to the point where the last governor, Vaudreuil, and the last intendant (roughly, "King's auditor"] Bigot were stealing the province blind, even as  Louis Joseph, Marquis the Montcalm-Gozon  marched out to meet his fatal wounds in the same battle which killed his rival  James Wolfe , posthumous conquerer of la Nouvelle France.

Both the French and  the Company of Gentlemen Adventurers Trading into Hudson's Bay  however, had a major distinction in common. Their livelihood in the worst years, and their fabulous wealth in the best years, came from not colonizing the interior. Both the French and the HBC positively discouraged the settlement of the interiors of the continent. People like Cadillac at Detroit, d'Iberville at New Orleans, and "lesser" men along the mid-Mississippi valley were royally-favored exceptions which proved the rule. HBC only gradually penetrated the interior, and then in response to first the French (d'Iberville's claim to fame was to captured all of the posts of Hudson Bay during the Nine Years War in Europe), and then the Franco-English traders from Montréal, and finally the Americans coming up the Missouri. They only began to push their "factories" (company stores) inland to assure that they were always closer to the pelt and fur bearing regions than the competition. The trappers and traders, the coureurs du bois, don't like to see the settlers come, it spoils their party. By and large, the aboriginals of central and western Canada suffered far less from the advent of the ghost men in the great white birds upon the water. All of the central purpose of this enterprise, however, went bust in a season, when  Albert , Prince and Prince Consort, decided to wear top hats made of silk on pasteboard rather than felt... so... perhaps mere shifts and smoking jackets might prove an interesting field of investigation as well.)
 
 
1 ) I think most of you already know this one, but is it really true Native Americans lived in harmony with nature? Not totally. Native Americans were people with high-principled cultures; to make room for villages and roads forests were burned, to build cities trees were cut down; some cities were abandoned because the population had ran out of natural resources. When hunting at buffalo's far more buffalo's were killed than necessary, out of fear surviving buffalo's would warn others. HOWEVER, the hunting on buffalo's by Native Americans was not the cause of the buffalo's near extinction. That were the white hunters, who managed to nearly kill all buffalo's in less than 50 years.

2 ) Fernâo de Magalhâes is often believed to be the first person to have sailed around the world. FALSE. On September 17th 1519, Magalhâes sailed out with 250 men from San Lucar, Spain. He was determined to sail around the world. However, Magalhâes was killed on April 27th 1521 in what we nowadays call the Philippines in a fight with the native population. It was his chief officer on the ship, Juan Sebastian de Elcano, who took the command, and under his leadership they reached San Lucar again on September 6th 1522, with only 18 men left.

3 ) It is often believed Martin Luther nailed his 95 theses on a church door in Wittenberg. But is that really true? Historians doubt this. They believe Luther went the official way, and sent his theses first to the archbishop.

4 ) Cowboys: tough men with revolvers. True? In most cases not. There were few cowboys who could afford a revolver, and even if they had a revolver, most of them were not able to shoot with it. This required intensive training, and a lot of bullets - things they didn't have the time and the money for (bullets were too expensive).

5 ) Hitler invented the phrase 'Blitzkrieg'. True? NO. As Hitler said himself at November 8th 1944, he 'would never use the phrase Blitzkrieg, because it is an absurd word'. The phrase became well-known after an article in the American weekly Time on September 25th 1939, in which the German invasion in Poland was described as a Blitzkrieg. The first time the word was used however, was in 1935 in Germany, in the German Deutsche Wehr magazine.
 
 
 
2 ) Fernâo de Magalhâes is often believed to be the first person to have sailed around the world. FALSE.
 

Again, no reputable historian believes that Magellan, after having been killed in the Philippines, actually completed the voyage.

 
4 ) Cowboys: tough men with revolvers. True? In most cases not. There were few cowboys who could afford a revolver, and even if they had a revolver, most of them were not able to shoot with it. This required intensive training, and a lot of bullets - things they didn't have the time and the money for (bullets were too expensive).
 

I have a lot of trouble believing this. A handgun would not have been the most expensive item in a cowboy's possession (both the horse and the saddle would have been more expensive). Furthermore, it's inconceivable that guns and bullets would have been prohibitively expensive; there was a brisk trade in both and a fair amount of competition in the industry (both guns and ammunition would have been sold through national catalog houses, like Sears, Roebuck & Co. and Montgomery Ward, as well as numerous independent dealers).

And being able to shoot with a revolver and being able to shoot accurately with a revolver are two entirely separate matters. Firing any weapon requires some degree of training, but to say that revolvers required "intensive training" is, I think, rather excessive. As it was, many of the legends of "deadeye" shootists facing off in the middle of the street are  greatly exaggerated. 

 
5 ) Hitler invented the phrase 'Blitzkrieg'. True? NO.
 

Considering that Hitler didn't have many original ideas to begin with, it's unlikely that anyone seriously thinks that he came up with the word "Blitzkrieg."
 
 
 
 
2 ) Fernâo de Magalhâes is often believed to be the first person to have sailed around the world. FALSE.
 

Again, no reputable historian believes that Magellan, after having been killed in the Philippines, actually completed the voyage.
 

Though simple history books enlist Magellan as being the first person who sailed around the world. That is, on this side of the pond :wink: (for what I know).

 
And being able to shoot with a revolver and being able to shoot accurately with a revolver are two entirely separate matters.
 

You are TOTALLY correct here. Keep in mind I'm translating this from Dutch, but on the other hand that is no excuse: you are absolutely right on this one. What I meant was indeed cowboys being able to shoot accurately. The thing about the revolver and the bullets though is maybe hard to believe, but it is true, both according to the Dutch book ''Encyclopedie van misvattingen' (Encyclopedia of misconceptions) by Hans van Maanen, and his source, Das Ei des Kolumbus und andere Irrtümer (P. Lauer - Munich, 2000). Maybe it's about the definition of cowboys: they really mean cow-boys, so not only the John Wayne types.

 
 
5) Hitler invented the phrase 'Blitzkrieg'. True? NO.
 

Considering that Hitler didn't have many original ideas to begin with, it's unlikely that anyone seriously thinks that he came up with the word "Blitzkrieg."
 

It depends. I bet there are some people who believe that the phrase Blitzkrieg was first used by the Nazis when the war began. The invasion of Poland however was not called Blitzkrieg for the first time by the Nazis, but by Time magazine (as pointed out).
 
 
 
In the same way, the important thing wasn't achieving powered, heavier-than-air flight (a Roman candle can do that) but in achieving powered controlled flight.
 

Joe,

More pedantry:

"Powered controlled flight" = Santos Dumont (at least, I bet there were others), he gave the dirigible (basically means "directable") its name, and showed that the flight could be controlled by flying it arround the Eiffel tower.

"Powered controlled heavier-than-air flight" = Wright brothers

 
In that respect, the catapult was largely irrelevant, since it has nothing to do with the control aspect of the flight, just the propulsion.
 

Actually it is not irrelevant, as the charge is that the flight in 1903 was not a powered flight at all, but just gliding.

I don't buy into this claim, but it is not without its adherents. An eye-witness to the flight claimed it was just gliding and the powered flight was only achieved in the 1908 attempt.

The New York Times December 17, 1951

 

 
Now, if Brazilians take a measure of pride in Santos Dumont's achievements (and they were no small achievements -- Santos Dumont was a very important figure in early aviation), in the same way that Norwegians take pride in the achievements of Leif Ericksson, well, I don't have a problem with that.
 

I do, their nationalism causes them to frequently practice revisionist history and claim Santos Dumont invented the airplane.

But if the catapult enabled them to pass a glide off as a powered flight the first time in 1903 then they have a point, because the powered flight in 1908 would not have post-dated Dumont's.
 
 
 
Joe,

More pedantry:
 

Craven : your pedantry may have been cute initially, but it has now grown tiresome. In any discussion of the Wright brothers' achievements, one may take it for granted that powered, controlled, heavier-than-air flight is being discussed. I would further add that we can also assume that we are discussing manned, assisted flight -- certainly, even Santos Dumont could not claim to be the first thing to become airborne, having been bested by some now-extinct aviation pioneers several million years earlier.

 
Actually it is not irrelevant, as the charge is that the flight in 1903 was not a powered flight at all, but just gliding.

I don't buy into this claim, but it is not without its adherents. An eye-witness to the flight claimed it was just gliding and the powered flight was only achieved in the 1908 attempt.
 

Alpheus Drinkwater was a weatherman and a telegraph operator. I'm not sure how that made him an expert on powered flight or why anyone should lend credence to his claim, made almost a half century after the fact, that the Wright brothers' plane did not make a powered flight until 1908. Perhaps Drinkwater would have us believe that, between 1903 and 1908, the Wrights, who staged numerous flying exhibitions around the country, were actually just gliding around on a plane with a motor and propellers as useless ballast.

Drinkwater may have been a estimable weatherman and telegrapher, but as an aeronautical observer he was, I would argue, certainly deficient.
 
 
 
Craven : your pedantry may have been cute initially, but it has now grown tiresome.
 

Missed your nap time?

You may be frustrated with the pedantry (if so, my recommendation is to cease to indulge in it) but it may well have taught me one thing (still checking on it). I don't think they acheived their first controlled flight in 1903, manned perhaps but the Flyer 1 only flew in straight lines, the Flyer 2 was more manageable and the Flyer 3 (1905) was the first practical one (the first one that they could land "without crashing" as Wilbur put it).

I don't think the 1903 flight should be called a controlled flight. Edit: I researched it, they did not have a "controlled" flight till September of 1904.

I also learned that the 1903 flight did not use a catapult, but rather strong winds.

 
Alpheus Drinkwater was a weatherman and a telegraph operator. I'm not sure how that made him an expert on powered flight....
 

I'm not sure that one would need to be an "expert" to recognize the difference between a glide and a powered flight. There were only 5 witnesses (John Daniels, Adam Etheridge, Will Dough, W.C. Brinkley and Johnny Moore) Joe, which flight "expert" do you rely on to substantiate the veracity of the claim that it was a sustained (for 12 seconds), powered flight? Drinkwater was not even a witness, and I was not posting the clipping for his opinion to be lent veracity but to illustrate that there was, in fact, controversy over the plane's propulsion and not control. You'd claimed the propulsion and catapult were irrelevant when it is, in fact the center of the controversy and control was not.

I think their subsequent flights (4 that day) may have qualified for being powered, but the 12 second 120 foot "first flight" does have some room for doubt. And the controversy has centered on whether it was gliding (like their previous flights) or a powered flight.

Since the Wright brothers had first made gliders it's not an outlandish claim. Without the strong winds the brothers were unable to get many of their subsequent attempts off the ground (for example, a subsequent attempt launched it off a 100 foot rail and the plane did not lift an inch).

See, you had claimed that "the catapult was largely irrelevant, since it has nothing to do with the control aspect of the flight, just the propulsion ".

Thing is, propulsion is the controversy.

There was no real control Joe, and the propulsion was the center of the controversy.

 
Drinkwater would have us believe that, between 1903 and 1908, the Wrights, who staged numerous flying exhibitions around the country, were actually just gliding around on a plane with a motor and propellers as useless ballast.
 

Drinkwater only witnessed a flight in 1908, that's why he named that date. But again, I don't take him seriously, it's just the only dated newspaper evidence I found of the controversy being propulsion, not control, at the time.

But they did manage a powered flight before 1908. As early as 1905 they were flying until the gas ran out, staying aloft up for times like about half an hour.

I'm not sure you can call any of what they did "exhibitions", they only started public exhibitions in 1908 in Europe and I believe the first "public flight" in America is said to be dated in 1909.

But I'll not defend Alpheus Drinkwater's credibility, I'd only posted that to correct your claim and not to dispute that the flights qualified.

The controversy has legitimate basis, the news reporting of the flights had been farcical (the next day the Virginia-Pilot claimed "Flying Machine Soars 3 Miles in Teeth of High Wind...").

The brothers did not fly after 1903 and their next flight was in mid 1904. The brothers would invite reporters but disallow photographs and many times they were unable to fly (in one example I mentioned they did not get off the ground at all, in another case they managed 25 feet).

The entire subsequent year was a failure for them, Orville said "We certainly have been "Jonahed" this year" and the reporters gave up on them.

Well, Joe, you may well be sick of this topic (and if so take heart in that I am too) but I have learned a lot and am simply documenting it here.

IMO, there is foundation for the concern about the 1903 flights being legitimate.

The next year they did poorly without wind and it was not till they started using catapults that they started doing better.

I'll never know what they did accomplish in front of 5 witnesses that day, but I do cede to their detractors that the initial flights have some question marks.
 
 
 
You may be frustrated with the pedantry (if so, my recommendation is to cease to indulge in it)....
 

I did not say that I found pedantry tiresome, I said that I found your pedantry tiresome. I remain a fan of pedantry as a general matter.

 
I don't think the 1903 flight should be called a controlled flight. Edit: I researched it, they did not have a "controlled" flight till September of 1904.
 

Which still would have made them the first.
 
 
Paaskynen, should you wish to use the Australian history examples I mentioned, here is the google search page for "Australian history wars" to start you off:

 http://www.google.com.au/search?q=%22Australian+History+Wars%22&ie=UTF-8&hl=en&btnG=Google+Search&meta= 
 
 
Gracie, wabbit...

(how does one say "wabbit" in italian?)
 
 
 
 
I don't think the 1903 flight should be called a controlled flight. Edit: I researched it, they did not have a "controlled" flight till September of 1904.
 

Which still would have made them the first.
 

Joe, you are addressing persons not present (nobody on this thread said otherwise).
 
 
 
 
You may be frustrated with the pedantry (if so, my recommendation is to cease to indulge in it)....
 

I did not say that I found pedantry tiresome, I said that I found your pedantry tiresome. I remain a fan of pedantry as a general matter.

 
I don't think the 1903 flight should be called a controlled flight. Edit: I researched it, they did not have a "controlled" flight till September of 1904.
 

Which still would have made them the first.
 

It seems like Joe and Craven are fighting out exactly the battle I mentioned.  

We need to recognise that the invention of the aeroplane (a heavier than air, controllable flying machine, powered by an engine). Commentators from different countries have for nationalistic reasons stressed the importance of the achievements of their countrymen by putting salt on snails. Lilienthal achieved sustained flight, controllable up to a point (he made 2500 glider flights before he killed himself in a crash), which is way more than most other aviation pioneers. Ader seems to have been the first to get off the ground in a heavier than air contraption with an engine, but his and Maxim's attempts suffered from lack of controllability, The Wright brothers and Santos seem to have come up with better controls. All these men were inspired by each other's attempts (especially Lilienthal's legacy, because he made detailed drawings and designs). It is in fact undoable to fix one moment when flight was achieved, it was an international achievement, but nationalism was strong in those days and thus we got history books with conflicting claims.

But thanks for giving me so much ammunition for my classes.  
 
 
history is always written by the victors!
 
 
Nonsense
 
 
Concerning first flight. I had run into this purely out of curiosity a while back. I think it's a pretty good web page though I am certainly no expert on flight or it's history. A good read if you are interested and definitely covers briefly all the people I have seen mentioned in this thread plus a few more.

 Who was the first to fly? 

I am of the opinion that history as we know depends on how well records are kept and made available. The fact that we humans are keeping track practically guarantees problems with accuracy every now and then. Emotion and personal perspective are always going to play a role in how people see the world around them, and in my opinion are very potent when it comes to recalling an incident.
Also just want to say thanks to everyone contributing to this thread as I always wonder about this kind of thing. After finding out so many *facts* I believed to be true are not exactly that way- makes me question just about everything I read or hear. Interesting stuff!
 
 
Thanks for a great link Hamal.
 
 
My pleasure!
 
 
Richard III is a good example where history was written by the victors - Shakespeare was writing for the Tudor dynasty and therefore Richard had to be a villain

At the time of Richard's death the monks in Durham wrote ' this day was most greviously slain our beloved king' or something like that. They didn't need to say anything good unless they meant it - it was risky to criticise the new king and nothing to be gained from praising a dead one.

Josephine Tey wrote an interesting novel - The Daughter of Time - about the reasons why Richard wasn't a villain, had no reason to murder the princes in the tower as his wardenship would end with their death and the successor (not him) become king.

The ones with a reason to murder the princes to enhance their claim to the throne were the Tudors.
 
 
You are correct, Vivien, but:
the art of the historian was not very advanced in this period, and no serious attempt was made to get at the exact truth about a king and his reign.

On the other hand, Shakespeare didn't write history books, but historical plays - he was a playwright, not an historian:wink:
 
 
yes, and the Tudors were paying  
 
 
 
3 ) Julius Caesar wasn't an emperor ; he was a dictator. The fact that a word like czar is derived from Ceasar, as being emperor, is incorrect.

 

true as far as it goes, however
his nephew was the first Emperor
IMPERATOR CAESAR DIVI FILIVS AVGVSTVS (Octavius\Augustus)
and CAESAR was the accolade of the next seven Emperors till Vitellius
AVLVS VITELLIVS GERMANICVS IMPERATOR AVGVSTVS
(actually a Co-emperor) and its was part of the Official Imperial name for the next 17 Emperors (\co-Emperors)

covering the Claudian, Flavian, Nervan-Antonian Dynasties
and was also employed by the Severan Dynasty

and of course Emperor is derived from Imperator

Im suprised no one has mentioned Nikola Tesla and Thomas Alva Edison
Edison being credited for Tesla's work, even today through the corporate efforts of Edison Electric,
great efforts where made to scrub history clean of Tesla

 http://www.ntesla.org/index.php 
 
 
More porkies by rulers
Ah, you just beat me to Caesar, Ice Tsar!

But I would add any account of Napoleon's wars emanating from the man himself (As in "To lie like a Bulletin") or indeed anyone, who has not gone beyond them. The idea that Napoleon was some libertarian when he appointed prefects to do his will in the provinces does not sit well with reaction to Putin this week.
 
 
in reply to what Vivien said (about Tudors and Shakespeare)
Wasn't it Thomas More who wrote the first history falsification about Richard III during the Tudor dynasty?

At any rate, he died before Shakespeare was born.
 
 
One that I have heard of but never verified is John Wilkes Booth did not break his ankle jumping onto the stage but broke it when his horse fell just after crossing the Anacostia River.

Anyone know about this?
 
 
The Egyptians played a greater part in history than what is precieved. Roman history is over enphasised;
Egyptian hyroglyphs have been found in australia.
Also i dont understand how you can discover a country that people are already living in. History should tell of how there once were ignorant people who believed that they discovered somewhere if they killed and controlled the people who were there first. The pespective is all wrong. History should detail not just the conquests of groups of people but also the mentalities that existed. Then maybe the next generation will be more civlised.
 
 
 
Egyptian hyroglyphs have been found in australia.

 

Have they now? I would be interested to know where you got that information (and then I would be interested to know what it said). It seems highly unlikely that the Egyptians would have made it that far, only to leave an inscription (without having left one on the way there, say in India). Methinks this ranks among the pseudo-archaeological finds like the "precolumbian" inscriptions in North America (runes, hebrew, celtic, etc.), but I would like to have the particulars out of curiosity.

So far the first non-aboriginals to reach Australia on record are the Dutch (and the inscribed plate they left as proof on the West Coast has been preserved until today)
 
 
I agree, Paaskynen.

Some info here:  Egyptian Hieroglyphs in Australia 

And: welcome to A2K, susie p!
 
 
Fascinating stuff, that, regarding the Australian hieroglyphs. Thanks for the link, Walter. I suspect that, in the end, they will prove to be about as authentic as the long discredited Norse runes found in a field in Wisconsin, USA.

xingu, that's the first I've heard that particular version of the John Wilkes Booth story. It makes sense, however, as Booth would have had tremendous difficulty mounting a horse outside Ford's theater with a broken left ankle.
 
 
 
Some info here:  Egyptian Hieroglyphs in Australia 
 

Thanks for the link Mr Hinteler. It is quite interesting, but does little to take away the misgivings about the authenticity of the carvings. However, the site discusses all the possibilities, which is a good sign.

It reminded me of another story with a high improbability factor (seen on Discovery some years ago), that of a Dutch colony having existed in the interior of Australia long before the British colonised the East Coast. You can read more about that on  http://www.ammerlaan.demon.nl/EARLY.HTM 

By the way when I said that the Dutch were the first non aboriginal people to visit Australia, I added "on record" (since they left an account of their visit), but it is highly likely that seafaring people from Indonesia have been visiting Oz long before that (but we have no record of their visits).
 
 
not to mention the supposed French "discoverying" there on the West Coast as well - but bad luck was always on their side it seems
 
 
Australia is quite a large island. It seems that it would be hard to miss by any people, adept at paddling a canoe, plying those waters. And there's no doubt about the paddling abilities of the Palynesians. They managed to discover the Hawaiian archipelago without aid of charts or compass, a somewhat longer trek than from, say, Tahiti to Australia.
 
 
I have never understood how they had unfinished maps and talked about the land mass as if it really wasn't there until they circumnavigated it...
 
 
I've read that Chinese ships under the famous Admiral Zheng He arrived in Australia. Is this true?
 
 
I have never heard that!
You have made me curious, just one more country trying to say they got there first.
There were alot of Chinese in Australia that settled there for the goldrush. I am going to investigate now.
 
 
 http://www.theage.com.au/articles/2002/11/24/1037697982893.html 

Look at that!
I wonder how true it is? Sounds plausible... it is The Age afterall. :wink:
 
 
I've heard it before!

Now, before Cook, there were some accounts on this subject.

look at this :
 http://www.muffley.net/pacific/dampier/dampier.htm 
 
 
Not impossible.

But 7 recorded voyages that i have known were all to the west.
 
 
I've heard it before as well. (Discovery channel documentary)
 
 
it is all pretty funny that they spend all this time debating who got to Australia first.

There was/is this crazy show on ABC in Australia, called "Fat Pizza" (I think you could only enjoy it if you were an Australian... you get to laugh at our culture), where they made this one with two Roman's discovering Australia and hanging out with the aboriginal people (don't ask what they did with them...) but it was certainly funny.

But I digress. :wink:
 
 
Digressing even further:  

I saw a mockumentary once of a group of Africans landing in England, claiming it for Africa (while allowing the indigenous people the right to live in this new land) going on an expedition into the interior, while uttering one insensitive misconception about their new white subjects after the other and paying their way with beads and mirrors  
 
 
funny... sounds as good as that mocumentary that they showed on april fools days in Australia two years ago that claimed they was no moon landing, and in fact Kubrick filmed it.
 
 
Glencoe is not a person but a branch of publishing house McGraw-Hill which specializes in soft technology and business.
 
 
Auschwitz.
The some of the most monstrous falsifications of philosophy and therefore history have been discussed [by me] at  http://www.able2know.com/forums/viewtopic.php?t=45062&highlight=;  Auschwitz: Sixty Years on, or Six Millennia?

This falsification-system starts in Genesis and continues with Matthew. An exampke is the notion that Adam and Eve were "made in God's image", and they parented a large family. Given current news-casts, was Cain's behaviour toward Able totally abnormal? If A & E were the first humans, from whence came the mothers and fathers of their grand-children...? Did A & E enjoy their procreactivity?

If we truly were made in God's image, Heaven has one Hell of a justice system; some BIG jails; and God runs around all day with a half-erection!
 
 
Who got to Oz first, after the Aborigines?

Up along the NW coast there are corroborees for welcoming and farewelling the Bugis (Sulawesi, Celebes) pearl, trochus-shell and beche-de-mer fleet when the winds were right: they were obviously welcome.

There is a legend around Warrnambool on the SE coast of a Mohogany Ship once bared in the dunes - Portuguese? Further west along that coast are many known wrecks; but not one story of an early pale-skinned survivor along the barren Bite coast. In the early 1500s Dutchman Hartog left an engraved pewter plate way over West, many others came too far east enroute The East and didn't land; the place was so inhospitable nobody bothered to map it, not even the very well travelled Chinese.

Up the North and NE the Aborigines were treated badly; there are a few stories of pale-skinned survivors, about the best known being William Buckley who greeted the first land-grabbers in Port Phillip Bay. Mum told of a large and popular Aboriginal family and attitude in Victoria's west, but a WW1 Aboriginal soldier was denied membership of the Returned Soldier's League... in the 1950s Aborigines became Citizens and were legally allowed alcohol, but mixed-race kids were still removed by the welfare authorities... in 1972 Gough Witlam officially killed The White Australia Policy.

There are many and various expensive theories and lucrative ideologies, but I think the Cain-and-Able one is the truest: Africans, Aborigines, Native Americans (is that the best term?) of the northern and southern continents were all head-butted by human greed and better weaponry. A Ghengis Khan sort of thing; and pre-dating even him.
 
 
RE: Aborginal people in Australia

A recent program on PBS, featuring a biologist who tracked the expansion of humans across the planet through the use of genetics shows that the first wave of modern humans left Africa and journeyed through the Middle East, down the Indian subcontinent and out to Australia. The human presence of Australia is ancient indeed.
 
 
Until recently officially the Aboriginal people arrived 40,000 years ago; but recent evidence suggests up to 20,000 years earlier.

A mystery: The people of inland Papua-New Guinea had a stone-age culture until comparatively recently, but more and more evidence is surfacing about worked granite: in the central mountains near the Irian Jaya border, Mt Hagen, Edie Creek, a volcanic island in the Solomon Sea, and well inland from the Gulf of Papua; one witness found flint arrowheads in the same deposit.

In 9 years working there I saw no evidence of either hollowed granite or flint tools: working axes were river-stones, ceremonial ones (i.e. close-combat weapons) were hand-ground slate or a species of non-gem jade. Arrow-heads were cassowary (like an emu or ostrich) toe-nails, hard-wood or bamboo.

Has anyone else seen similar?
 
 
Hi, Allsixkinds,

Are you an archaeologist? I'm intrigued by your addresses: Poland and Australia. I am partially of Polish descent.
 
 
Hi Plainoldme: I am Polish by marriage (!); lived here for a whiole and we are trying to get back to Oz, but the skiing's still good...

I can't stand TV so I read a lot (!), I'm interested in everything from archaeology to current leadership shenannigans especially King Shrub 2nd. I worked all over PNG and Indonesia, and on some high-falutin' engineering things.

Re the mocumentary about Africans claiming England: Peter Sellers made a movie called "The Mouse That Roared"; as usual playing 5 or 6 parts. His tiny Duchy decided to declare war on The West intending to lose, and score a free massive rebuilding postwar. Unfortunately for the Duchy they won!

Another stunning series is the Oz ABC's "Bush Mechanic" - better than Mr Bean I reckon.
 
 
The Mouse that Roared is based on a novel by Leonard Wibberly. Read it about 40 years ago... or longer!
 
 
We've gone off-track, from falsification to parody of history...

Falsification: if you Google up "consensus politics" you will find one of the most pernicious politial tricks in the American lexicon; and Washington/Langley/FBI (now being driven to destruction by Shrub The Second) have a HUGE library of dirty tricks.

F'rinstance: there have been nearly a hundred federally-funded American Medical Association conferences to vote-in certain matters Shrub wants: he can then set their decisions in legislative concrete. It's easy: get 50 or 100 "eminent experts" of the right politics and a token few dissenters: your "concensus conclusion" has been fore-ordained but you have satisfied "democracy".

Science is based on fact: a team develops something and if another team repeats and confirms the results the theory is accepted; until new evidence proves otherwise, and that proof is verified. Concensus politics is opinion not science, but is being rammed down our throats. In this context consensus is nonsense.

This is the system that prescribed clitoridectomy to "cure" sexy wimmin, aversion-therapy to "cure" homosexuals; and routine male circumcision (the AMA changed it's consensical mind on the latter only because of insurance problems). It was the AMA who invented approved and made lots of money from, medicines that were later banned (Thalidomide for one); who denigrated Chiropractic treatment (don't EVER let a medico touch your bad back!); and who reluctantly allowed Traditional Chinese Medicine to be practiced (if you have joints-problems consult a TCM).

This was the sort of politicial manipulation which outlawed alcohol (Prohibition in the 1920s) and any thought word or deed considered UnAmerican by Sen. McCarthy (1950s); which chucked marijuana into the same category as heroin &c but approved tobacco; said that VietNam, Somalia (the movie "Blackhawk Down"), Afghanistan and Iraq would be quick and easy victories: it was the system that put Saddam Hussein in power in the first place!

It is the system used to outlaw sex-education for kids, making Norte-Americano teeners more than 5 times more likely than Europeans to catch HIV/AIDS and other STDs, or get pregnant.

And now The Shrub is forcing his religious righteousness over States' Rights; in the State that was responsible for his first-term election, too -- careful, Ohio!!

Definition: a shrub is a small garden plant chosen only for its looks; which requires a lot of care; and which usualy produces nothing.
 
 
That brings up an interesting point: until the Enlightenment, women controlled their births through herbal abortafacients. Ever wonder about some of the plants in the traditional Medieval herb garden that seem to have no flavor and no current medicinal value? Women used them to space their children and to keep their family size within the limits of their incomes.
 
 
Agreed, and the reason they are out of favour is greed: pharmaceuticals is a huge industry, but anyone can grow herbs. (That sentence started as a typo-error!)

My favourite quote is still Jini Thompson's plea to the MDs at  Listen To Your Gut (excerpt)  :

 
At this time, I merely wish to stimulate your own thought process and encourage you to open up to unconventional possibilities and ideas, to pursue the many layers of truth and the many facets of reality, rather than latching onto the flat, easy, one-dimensional answer.
 

Have you read Jean Auel's Clan of the Cave Bear et seq ? The old herbal knowledge has been preserved all over Europe and especially Eastern Europe, where it is very popular during their frequent hard times (i.e. German and Russian occupations). Especially in spring, their markets are full of wild vegetation which all good mothers learned all about from their mothers. My wife has many secret, delicious and beneficial recipes.

Not all contraception was by termination. I worked on an island in the Pacific where the girls were very friendly, and the island had been a WW2 airbase: not one mixed-race kid resulted from any interactions. I asked, and a lady gave me samples of her contraceptive and complete instructions: exactly as her mother taught her and she taught her daughters. But why did my employee's adopted girl get pregnant? Her new mother is from a different island, and didn't know our herbs... I didn't ask about the termination.

Ask the Chinese about alternative medicine: I go to an MD for sickie-tickets and X-rays, then to a TCM for treatment; they are now covered by Australian medical insurance. When you have TCM and MD in the one Doctor, you have powerful cures: few of which are accepted in the West.

Some bush-medicines have been adopted: bacterial action, smallpox-vax and penicillen started from natural causes, curare was a popular muscle-relaxant; alt-med shops, clinics and web-sites abound, and a lot of private labs are researching heavily.

But the political dominance of the medico-chemical industry's quasi-theocratic moral blindness and its myriad known side-effects keeps the alt-meds in the background.

The fly in the cream-jug is that greed operates in all industries, and soon we will see massive bureaucratic controls in alt-med.

I think that if they'd let some of the Babchias run the show, we'd all be a lot happier and healthier and The Shrub not so anal-retentive.
 
 
The babcias?
 
 
Literally, Grandmothers: the guardians of culture and family honour who know everything worth knowing.
 
 
I know. This is the first time I've seen that word online. It made me think of my wonderful grandmothers...both of them polar opposites in personality, style, attitude, appearance, but both strong and wise.
 
 
Interesting that the wisdom of the ages, which originated in much the same way the products of laboratories come to us -- by cuious folks sampling herbs to see what happens -- are ignored, largely because they are "traditional."
 
 
And the absolute summit of insanity is when a Western pharmaceutical giant informs the natives of a poor country that they can no longer use their traditional herb like they had been since time immemorial, because the company has patented its medicinal use worldwide!
 
 
There are no bigger criminals in the world than the purveyors of western pharmaceuticals (sp?)!
 
 
Yes, I agree, Plainoldme. That is why the government should shut down all of the greedy drug companies, exprrpriate their facilities( after paying for them, of course) and set up a government system, which, as everyone knows, is far more effective than the system we have now.
 
 
Dear POM: there are bigger criminals: the people who invent and approve this shit for public consumption.

When your pill-pusher tells you of known side-effects from the latest chemical concoction or that you must take it in certain circumstances, he knows damn well there's a chance it can make you sicker or maybe kill you. The American Medical Association controls the US Food and Drugs Administration which approves these expensive poisons.

Go back to Jini Thompson and her flat, easy, one-dimensional solutions.
 
 
How simplistic!!!
There are many deleterious side effects to my aunt's blood pressure medicine--most of them in the 1 or 2%% range of probability. She does not dare, however, having had Blood Pressure readings around 180/100 to stop her medication because of the slight chance that she be bothered by side effects.
 
 
How simplistic!!!
There are many deleterious side effects to my aunt's blood pressure medicine--most of them in the 1 or 2%% range of probability. She does not dare, however, having had Blood Pressure readings around 180/100 to stop her medication because of the slight chance that she be bothered by side effects.
 
 
How'd we get from falsification of history to bashing pharmaceutical companies?
 
 
 
To the victor the spoils
 
and history is written by those with the big bucks.

Apart from the military-industrial, what is the biggest money-maker in the world? Chemical- and knife-based doctoring!
 
 
 
Apart from the military-industrial, what is the biggest money-maker in the world? Chemical- and knife-based doctoring!
 

The God biz is pretty big---possibly bigger than the cut and drug biz. Fer instance most Calvinists, Anglicans, and Methodists don't seem to realize that the 'perfect book', the KJ Bible 1612, is a second edition. It seem that a KJ Bible was published in 1611, but this 'perfect book' didn't achieve perfection and was recalled for editorial errors.

Rap
 
 
Yes Rap, religion was the biggest I reckon, until the advent of patented medicines.

Try this little feller, he'll lift your eyebrows:  Death by Medicine 

Nothing can touch the hospital-emergency services when something's really broken, but they can still kill you. Halfway through the VietNam war the US Army realised that wounded soldiers were better off with low blood pressure because this aided healing especially internal. More than half a war-worth of reopened wounds because everyone said pour the claret into 'im !

Over-riding of course is the fact of war: men have been doing this for a very, very long time. We just refuse to learn that fighting proves absolutely nothing except mine's bigger'n yours, until someone nastier comes along and knocks your lolly off; and so on and on.

That's fine for the powerful and those who can afford the best; but f'rinstance the Iraqi populace don't like to compare life now with life BG (before George).

Let's all think back to Jini Thompson and open up to unconventional possibilities and ideas... pursue the many layers of truth and the many facets of reality ; it'll be expensive and long, but "grass-roots" opinion and discussion will change the upper Washington ranks just like Solzhenitsyn did; with just a little help from Pope JP2 and Walensa. If you don't believe and teach this, it may be better to just lay down and die right now.

The world needs a hell of a lot of TLC - the tenderest of loving care... not the poisons in our veins and our guts, the knives we're getting now.

And I intend to enjoy a few more years yet - if only to enjoy the welfare my taxes have been paying for, for so long.

 
 
 
Paaskynen,

Re: The History of the World

Now that my ribs have stoped hurting and I can breath again... Did Sam Goldwin pen that? I fear that the communication skills of students today are not in decline, they have hit bottom. Their grasp of World history is truly unique. My deepest thanks for the best laughing fit I have had in years.

My favorite historic propaganda comes from my Catholic grade school days. The Crusades were launched to save Jerusalem from the infidels. I wonder how all of those poor Knights came back rich Knights?
 
 
Re: Examples of falsification of history

 
Throughout the course of history the description of quote]

Well said. You have books in elementary schools that depict Lincoln as the great advocate of slaves and that being his desired endgame during the civil war. In reality he was fighting to unite the confederate colonies and using the slaves as propaganda. He was an owner himself. Along with a few green back presidents. Isn't it great that we etched them in stone and printed them on greenbacks because they symbolized freedom..... owning slaves with minimal publicity,
 
 
 
There is absolutely no reason to believe that Lincoln ever owned a slave of any description.
 
 
What???? He never said he didn't advocate the trade and numerous inuendos have been made indicating he did so alond with many founding fathers. I'll load some text tonight. I guess you were a victim of falsification of history. XOXOXO
 
 
Lincoln never owned slaves but his father-in-law did.
 
 
A misuse of history is quite prevalent right now.

The right, in attempting to fight gay marriage, claims, historically, marriage has always been between a man and a woman.

Strictly speaking, that is not true. Marriage has always been a way to insure property rights will be protected and that families have a way of holding on to their land. It was an economic relationship and the couple was almost incidental to the alliance wrought.
 
 
 
What???? He never said he didn't advocate the trade and numerous inuendos have been made indicating he did so alond with many founding fathers. I'll load some text tonight. I guess you were a victim of falsification of history. XOXOXO
 

Keep your cute little xoxox crap to yourself. You are either the victim of online crap, or you're trying to peddle crap yourself. The above quoted passage makes little sense in standard English, and you are falsifying history yourself even now. The founding fathers is a term used to refer to those who made the revolution (1775-83), and those who made the Constitution (1787). Abraham Lincoln was born in February, 1809, more than a generation after the revolution. It is doubtful that an awkward backwoods boy with no formal education had any opportunity to speak with Thomas Jefferson, for example, who was dead before Lincoln reached his eighteenth birthday. Adams died the same days as Jefferson, and Washington was in his grave a decade before Lincoln was born. Either you are confused about names and dates and the conjunction, or lack thereof, of peoples lives and actions; or you are peddling some nonsense you have credulously swallowed due to a lack of the ability to judge your sources.

Lincoln on slavery and freedom:

"Those who deny freedom to others, deserve it not for themselves; and, under a just God, can not long retain it." -- April 6, 1859, letter to Henry Pierce

"I have here stated my purpose according to my view of official duty; and I intend no modification of my oft-expressed personal wish that all men everywhere could be free." -- August 22, 1862, letter to Horace Greeley

"In giving freedom to the slave, we assure freedom to the free--honorable alike in what we give, and what we preserve. We shall nobly save, or meanly lose, the last best, hope of earth." -- December 1, 1862, Message to Congress

"We have, as all will agree, a free Government, where every man has a right to be equal with every other man. In this great struggle, this form of Government and every form of human right is endangered if our enemies succeed." -- August 22, 1864, in speaking to the One Hundred Sixty-fourth Ohio Regiment, as recorded in numerous newspapers

"You know I dislike slavery; and you fully admit the abstract wrong of it."

and

"The slave-breeders and slave-traders, are a small, odious and detested class, among you; and yet in politics, they dictate the course of all of you, and are as completely your masters, as you are the master of your own negroes." -- August 24, 1855, letter to Joshua Speed

"This is a world of compensations; and he who would be no slave, must consent to have no slave." -- April 6, 1859, letter to Henry Pierce

Finally, what is perhaps his most celebrated comment on the subject, from the Lincoln-Douglas debates, 1858:

"As I would not be a slave, so I would not be a master. This expresses my idea of democracy. Whatever differs from this, to the extent of the difference, is no democracy."

All of this material can easily be verified. Are you going to be able to provide verifiable sources after you have "loaded some text?"
 
 
Temper, temper, Set. I've run into this sort of crapola among people who have absolutely no knowledge of history and actually confuse Abraham Lincoln with George Washington! (If you find that hard to fathom, you should have met the young lad who asked me whether Geo. Washington had fought for the Blue or the Gray.) I have personally been asked whether I fought in World War I or II? I mean, I know I'm not geting any younger but... Then there was the student who didn't realize that the Korean conflict came after World War II.

These are not matters of falsification of history but, rather, of the generally abysmal state of knwledge about history in general among "the general", as Shakespeare called the masses.
 
 
I was at a party almost 20 years ago, and a young woman was holding forth on the day Kennedy was shot. I gave her the squinty-eyed once over, and suggested that she were not old enough to recall the event. She blushed, and then, to change the subject, she asked who was the President when i was born. I replied Harry Truman. She said: "Who?"

 
 
 
I'm always appalled when I meet people nearing their age of majority who have never heard of Truman or Eisenhower, for whom Roosevelt is a just a vague name (and they constantly confuse Teddy with Franklin) and who think that Hoover is only a vacuum cleaner brand. And don't ever mention Garfield to these folks. To them, it's only a fat cat.
 
 
I can see why you're appalled at such ignorance, Andrew, but your post made me smile anyway.  
 
 
Is that kitty awinkin' at us ? ! ? ! ?

The ol' flirt...

When my grandfather and grandmother were born, William McKinley was President. I was raised in their house, and during the Fourth of July parade in that slice of small town Americana, they'd prop up the Spanish War veterans in the back of a Caddy convertible to wave to the crowd. My grandfather and his contemporaries of the Great War era made up the color guard, while the Dubya-Dubya Two vets were allowed to march behind them. You could still see model A Fords and the original Ford trucks sitting in farm yards, and we still got milk from the milk train in the morning.

There was a connection to the past, and timeless social ritual in my childhood which i do not know still continues. It's a shame if our children and children's children will lose that connection to what we were and where and how we lived...

hmmmm
 
 
As to the falsification of history who has not seen a western where the heathen Indians scalp (horrors) white men. It seems that the white men taught them how.

Origins

Scalping in North America

Scalping is believed to have been a tradition in Plains Native Americans, who may have been isolated from European settlers until later in the colonization of the north America [1] (http://college.hmco.com/history/readerscomp/naind/html/na_034800_scalpsandsca.htm). Another theory is that Native Americans learned the practice of scalping from the Europeans. Although archaeologists have found a few prehistoric human remains in the Americas with show evidence of cut marks on the skulls, they disagree about whether these marks are evidence of scalping. No evidence exists that scalping was a widespread practice in the Americas before European contact. If it was practised, it was done by very few tribes and then very infrequently.

Scalping by Europeans

However, scalping was a well-established tradition for certain groups in Europe at some periods. Herodotus, the Greek historian, wrote of the Scythians in B.C. 440: "The Scythian soldier scrapes the scalp clean of flesh and softening it by rubbing between the hands, uses it thenceforth as a napkin. The Scyth is proud of these scalps and hangs them from his bridle rein; the greater the number of such napkins that a man can show, the more highly is he esteemed among them. Many make themselves cloaks by sewing a quantity of these scalps together."

Records also show that the Earl of Wessex scalped his enemies in 11th century and later the English paid bounties for Irish heads. Because scalps were easier to transport and store than heads, European headhunters sometimes scalped their victims rather than decapitating them.

In 1706 the governor of Pennsylvania offered 130 pieces of eight for the scalp of any Indian male over twelve years of age and 50 pieces of eight for a woman's scalp. Because it was impossible for those who paid the bounty to determine the sex, and sometimes the age, of the victim from the scalp alone, killing women and children became a way to make easy money. See also the British Scalp Proclamation of 1756. [2] (http://www.danielnpaul.com/BritishScalpProclamation-1756.html)

During the French and Indian Wars and later during the war between the British and the Colonists, both the British and the French encouraged their Indian allies to scalp their enemies providing them with metal scalping knives.

The practice of paying bounties for Indian scalps did not end until the 1800s.

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Scalping 
 
 
My friend who went to Catholic school was taught that the French Revolution was a religious revolution. That's pretty wrong.
 
 
That would depend upon the context. Robspierre's Comité de salut publique made all priests employees of the state, paying them salaries, and requiring them to swear ( jurer ) an oath of feallty to the state, in an attempt to intervene between them and the control of the church by the Bishop of Rome. Many conservative priests refused to take the oath, and were hence known as "non-juring" priests. They were most common in la Vendée, the heartland of counterrevolution. Priests from other regions sought refuge there.

Napoleon later forced a concordat on the Pope to recognize the revolutionary settlement, but he repudiated it as soon as he escaped captivity.

So, depending upon the context of what your friend was taught, it would not be unreasonable to state that the French revolution entailed, among many other changes, a religioius revolution.
 
 
Good to see you here again Setanta!!!
 
 
My time is limited, O'George, by vision problems. My eyes are hurting right now, because i've spent too much time here this weekend, but i've enjoyed myself.

Thank you for your kind comment...
 
 
This forum is about the falsification of history. To the victor the spoils, and also to the victor the privelege of writing history. The the slave-owning Confederate States damn near won that fratricidal war: imagine the history of the US of A fromTHAT standpoint! Falsification? The Yankees wanted only to subdue a huge political faction, and altered enough facts to prove that they were right. WMDs in Iraq?

Merry Andrew, one method of falsification is failing to teach : Tolstoy reminded us that flunking History condemns us to repeat those bitter lessons.

Yes, Good Ol' Abe was a slave-owner, and DNA tests are showing that the Founding Fathers enjoyed hanky-panky with their human posesssions. There is even evidence that Abe was homosexual: a hundred, two hundred years later the truth is coming out. Monika's Bill avoided it nicely, but I wonder if either of the Georges has left a secret DNA-trail...

To the victor the writing of history: in the early 90s Australia's Labour government told us, and it is now writ large in our history books, that we had an economic depression ten years earlier during a Liberal-Country Party (coalition) government. We actually had a small business recession, a tightening of credit. But then, Oz is only one percent of the world economy so who gives a damn!

What is being written now in the US is Shrub Two 's version of what's going on; that The People Of The United States want a theocracy; that they have a right to be the world's Policeman (Shrub One told the world that it must learn that "what we say, goes!"); that they are not reducing a whole country to chaos and terrorism just to gain control of oil-fields; and (Back In The States) that kids can remain asexual until marriage so it is wrong to talk about pregnancy and disease control. One expression is "burying your head in the sand".

Fortunately there are people in that great country who see reality. Unfortunately the falsifications may have damaged the Constitution. Will it survive intact? Look at the furore over Professor Wade Churchill and his First Amendment rights.

I may sound anti-American: I am not. America has contributed much more that it has destroyed in this world: one has only to remember who landed men on the moon and robots on Mars and elsewhere; and who stopped communism from consuming the world. Fabulous stuff, wonderful work; but instead of another brilliant (and blatantly sexy) JFK all we get were "I am not a liar", publicised sneaky-blow-jobs and viciously mean-mouthed God-botherers who "sex-up" evidence to justify another extremely expensive ideological war. What would have happened in Vietnam if LBJ hadn't fallen into power?

I am not anti-American: I am anti-bu115h1t, anti "I-am-holier-than-thou". Maybe that's why I read the New York Times not the Washing-Machine Post.

BTW, the Crusades were invented to get rid of excess population in Europe, especially the younger sons of the ruling classes; and of course, to bring home the treasures of the Mysteriously Wealthy East. Was it the Vatican's Vietnam?

Dare we suggest that the Iraq invasion is another Crusade?
 
 
Do you serve canapes with your rant?
 
 
Allsix -- I believe it was George Santayana, not Tolstoy, who made the famous comment that those who do not learn from history are doomed to repeat it. Where do you get your startling information that Lincoln owned slaves? From the Sons of the Confederacy? And that nonsense about his homosexuality was started by the gays, I think. They'd love to have someone of Abe Lincoln's stature be in their camp. Didja know that Bill Clinton is really a homosexual and that the whole Levinsky affair was manufactured for a cover-up?
 
 
If Lincoln was, as we might say today, "soft on" slavery, then his election would not have caused southern states to begin to withdraw from the Union.

Lincoln's family was poor: almost as poor as the slaves themselves were. After educating himself, he began to practice law and supported himself and his family as a lawyer, not as a plantation owner.
 
 
 
So, depending upon the context of what your friend was taught, it would not be unreasonable to state that the French revolution entailed, among many other changes, a religioius revolution.
 

I was actually aware of Robspiere and whatnot, but to teach it in only a religious context is completely wrong.
 
 
Well, you don't provide enough information for anyone here to make a reasonable judgment.
 
 
I'm not trying to change anyone's mind by any means. I'm just trying to shed some light on the fact that history books don't shed light on the fact that some of our former forefathers didn't make decisions entirely due to their own beliefs,but maybe to appease the majority of minds. And that some may have called the kettle black. I'm working on locating that text so I can hotsync it or just give a link if it's too long.
 
 
You're changing your story as you go along, as well. Previously, you had lumped Lincoln in with the founding fathers, and obvious error, and you had contended that Lincoln was not opposed to slavery, and that there were evidence that he owned slaves, both of which are false.

Many of the "founding fathers" were slave owners, and no one here is likely to dispute that. But when you fling accusations around, especially in these fora, you need to have your facts and their sources marshalled before hand.
 
 
 
Many of the "founding fathers" were slave owners, and no one here is likely to dispute that. But when you fling accusations around, especially in these fora, you need to have your facts and their sources marshalled before hand.
 

Whoa buddy. Correct your position when addressing me. I don't attack so don't attempt to with me. You will not get far. I am simply stating that I have read and heard that Lincoln was partially or fully okay with slavery but he publicly opposed it as political foder. I didn't want to leave your reply unresponded to but I WILL post the contrary statements. See my posts in the "Unpopular" thread and maybe you can understand me better. In the mean time back off. We are entitled to an opinion.
 
 
It is not an attack to criticize your rhetorical style. You did indeed arrive in this thread and begin making wild statements about Lincoln and other unspecified "founding fathers." I haven't the faintest notion of what the word "foder" is supposed to mean. Do not tell me what to correct. Don't tell me to back off, either. When you post crap, i will come along and observe that you have posted crap, as is my right, and one of the exercises in debate which one expects here. Certainly everyone is entitled to an opinion; you didn't make your initial remarks statements of opinion, you made vague statements, without attribution or support of any kind, which were therefore statements from authority on your part. No one here has any reason to consider that you have the authority to make such statements. When i criticized what you had written, i provided quotations from Lincoln on the subject and their sources. If you want to launch into an opinionated diatribe against an individual or individuals, as historical figures, that's ok by me, and most everyone else here. If you do not qualify your statement as the expression of opinion, it has to be assumed that you are stating alleged facts, and then the contents are fair game for anyone who wants to lay into them.

Criticing what you've written and how you've written it might not be palatable to you, but i don't know you at all, and have made no comments on you personally, only on what you've written.
 
 
The major "evidence" for Lincoln's ambivalence on the slavery question usually cited by the Lincoln bashers is the letter he wrote to Horace Greeley, editor of the New York Herald, in which he avowed that if he could preserve the Union without freeing a single slave, he would do so. He went on to say that if he could preserve the Union by freeing some slaves and leaving others servile, he would do that, too. The point he was trying to make was that the question of preserving the Union was paramount in his agenda, was his "prime directive", if you will. Nowhere is there are an implication that he was not solidly against slavery, merely that at this point in the War it was somewhat lower on his agenda than the all-important problem of opposing the secession of the southern states.

To some extent, this was a politically motivated missive. Because Lincoln has been virtually cannonized by later historians, we forget that during his own tenure he was immensly unpopular in some quarters, and I'm not talking about the states of the Confederacy. If there had been popularity polls in his day, his popularity rating would have been zilch in places like New York City. Remember the draft riots? People did not want to go to war for what they perceived as a campaign to end slavery. Quite frankly, they didn't give a damn about slavery or about the plight of the Negroes in North America. Lincoln wrote to Greely to emphasize that the abolition of slavery was not the prime reason for the war. The preservation of the United States was.

This has been often misunderstood and I've seen portions of that letter posted as "proof" that Lincoln didn't have an anti-slavery position. Now that is falsification of history.
 
 
There are history books and then there are history books.

When someone uses the word history book, I immediately think they mean school teaching text, and not just a general book written about a period. I may be wrong in thinking that, but, according to my idealect, a history book is a school text book.

I tried to develop something on abuzz and was largely misunderstood -- puposefully, in some quarters -- that there are some subjects that, when taught at the high school level (and certainly the high school level of 50 years ago, when children had a less sophisticated background then they do today) are simplified to the point of error. Chemistry was cited as just such a class when I was in high school and college during the 1960s. Theology is another, as I discovered while a student at a Catholic college.

Now, history needn't be simplified to the point of error. However, a history text, like a book that explores a particular event or period or nation written for the general public, may represent a particular point of view. Hence, there are "revisionist" books.

Others may not necessarily represent a view point but may be sloppy. This sloppiness may be a failure to give a preceding historian his due (plagiarism). It may also be a more serious form of sloppiness. I recently read a book that was fairly good by Constance Brittain on the knightly class in late Medieval France. Immediately afterward, I began reading Georges Duby on the development of the Western European economy. Brittain (that may be the second of her three names and not the third) clearly did not think or research as carefully as Duby. Despite the fact that Brittain wrote for a more general audience than Duby, she could have put a little more time in her reasoning, which tended to be of the shoot-from-the-hip variety.

Anyway, that was said as a piece of advice to participants. Another piece of advice is: Don't challenge Setanta. He's incredibly smart and much better informed than most. And you did call Lincoln both a slave owner and a Founding Father, which no one can chalk up to careless typing.
 
 
I found this article in my morning browse, and it occurred to me to post it on this thread.

 http://www.taemag.com/issues/articleid.18526/article_detail.asp 

"Revisionist history." In our culture, the label clearly denotes a negative to a position and anyone associated with it. But sometimes, even if unintentionally, I think it's been used in the same vein as "Racism."

It's pretty widely recognized in my country that the statement: "He's a Racist" is used less as a genuine observation and more as a weapon to shut down or shut out unfavorably realities. It's a slur to arouse emotions and bury uncomfortable truths, including the people who might ask for them. Everyone has probably used similar methods (I have, to my regret) or has been a victim of this method before (here too).

"Revisionist Historians" may be abhorred, but nobody believes that History is perfect; it's a human product and subject to all our vagaries. It has to be subject to Darwinian scrutiny. Of course, challenging existing history isn't necessarily a good thing, unless what is challenged is false. But we'll never know if it's true or false unless it can stand up to that challenge (consistently, because later generations will review the previous generation's History).

If a person is a Racist or a Revisionist Historian, that will be self evident while the discussion advances, not when it is simply declared.

The author of the article believes that a large segment of the World and the Media is perpetuating a "revisionist" History. Is this true? Or is it the Media that got the story right? What does everyone remember about the LAPD, Rodney King, LA race riots, OJ and Furhman? Is it the same from what they believe now?
 
 
Historiography is the study of the method(s) whereby historical information is accumulated, and the value of evidence ajudged. Contemporary accounts of events tell us things which we might never be able to discover, if we only look at later descriptions of events. Successive investigations turn up documents and accounts which were not available to the contemporary writers. In both cases, the history which gets written reveals as much about the writer and his/her times as it does about the event under consideraton. Theodore Roosevelt, Jr. wrote the definitive history of the naval war of 1812--and his jingoistic American patriotism is plain to see within the lines of carefully researched and carefully vetted material. He also wrote a biography of Oliver Cromwell, which once again, reveals as much about Teddy Roosevelt as it does about the Lord Protector.

One of our members who is no longer with us (an historian, a professional teacher of history at the higher education level) cogently observed that all historians are revisionists, if they are doing their job properly. The only way to be certain of one's ground is to check the sources and make an educated judgment as to the value of testimony. Our children don't get that in school, and adults haven't sufficient interest (and little wonder, as poorly as history is taught in our schools) to do that kind of work. It is so much easier to simply buy into the story which is handed out as the prevailing version of history. If that story is completely correct, it is likely due more to chance than intent. Marx became obsessive about history and its "uses" because he well understood that a people use someone's version of history to define themselves. Many people have a stake in how history is written; few seem to have a stake in historical truth. Revisionist has become a slur, and that is because the state of historical knowledge is such in the general population that they can easily be cozened into plunking down their hard earned money for a sensational account which purports to expose historical lies and finally reveal the deep dyed conspiracies about which we were never to know. Most of that is claptrap. Nevertheless, as the Hobbit correctly pointed out, all historians are revisionists, if they are doing their jobs.
 
 
I just came upon this fascinating thread today, so my corections are for the first page:

Thok,
....Before the vikings there were the Africans. There are pyramids in South America also. Of course much has been buried and obscured about the rich, and highly developed civilizations of Africa.

Paaskynen,
....Socrates was given HEMLOCK, not wedlock. Although I'm sure wedlock has taken many lives throughout history.  
....May I ask, what is the sourse of your name?
 
 
The existance of a pyramid, in and of itself, doesn't mean much: consider how small children easily build step-pyramid forms with their blocks.
 
 
Perhaps I shouldn't included the pyramids, it only distracted from the point that I have read in more than one place, that this was so.
 
 
A pyramid is so basic a structure that it's hardly surprising it would have been developed by more than one civilization independently. Besides, the Mesoamerivan structures aren't at all like the Egyptian variety. Same shape, is all. The Egyptian pyramids were elaborate tombs; the Mayan variety were places of worship and human sacrifice. I have clambered to the top of the big one at Chichen Itza and looked across the excavated ruins of the entire village. You couldn't do that at Giza.
 
 
I had to go an mention the d**n pyramids......   That's all he sees now.
 
 
 
I had to go an mention the d**n pyramids......  
 

Yeah, why did ya go & do that? You know how just the mention of pyramids does strange things to people...  
 
 
I met a pyramid onc't... scheming bastard...
 
 
 
Paaskynen,
....Socrates was given HEMLOCK, not wedlock. Although I'm sure wedlock has taken many lives throughout history.  
....May I ask, what is the sourse of your name?
 

I know about the hemlock, I was quoting an article like it says at the beginning of the piece (in blue).

My name is Finnish and it means swallow (except that I use it on-line without the dot on the A's).
 
 
 
I met a pyramid onc't... scheming bastard...
 

   
 
 
Well it's about damned time... i'm glad somebody got the joke...
 
 
And then there's always Amway...You can't blame that on the Egyptians

(Don't look at me, Setana started it.)  
 
 
Ah, now the time is ripe... take it away, Steve...

King Tut, King Tut
Now when he was a young man,
He never thought he'd see
People stand in line to see the boy king.

King Tut--How'd you get so funky?
Funky Tut--Did you do the monkey?
Born in Arizona,
Moved to Babylonia--King Tut.

King Tut--Now, if I'd known
They'd line up just to see you,
I'd trade in all my money
And bought me a museum--King Tut.

Buried with a donkey--Funky Tut.
He's my favorite honkey!
Born in Arizona,
Moved to Babylonia--King Tut.

Dancin' by the Nile--Disco Tut.
The ladies love his style,--Waltzing Tut.
Rockin' for a mile--Rockin' Tut.
He ate a crocodile.

He gave his life for tourism.
Golden idol!
He's an Egyptian
They're sellin' you.

Now, when I die,
Don't think I'm a nut,
don't want no fancy funeral,
Just one like ole King Tut--King Tut.

He coulda won a Grammy,
Buried in his Jammies,
Born in Arizona, moved to Babylonia,
He was born in Arizona, lived in a condo made of stone-a,
King Tut!
 
 
 
....Before the vikings there were the Africans. There are pyramids in South America also. Of course much has been buried and obscured about the rich, and highly developed civilizations of Africa.

 

What are you attempting to present here? There's no DNA /STR data of which Im aware that connects any populations of living Inca, Monte Alban, MEsoAmericans or Amerinds or Innuit or Aleutian Island with any populations in Africa. If there is data on this, Id love to see it and Ill gladly begin anew my weekend inquiries into Paleo American cultures
 
 
Yuck!.....I feel like I just got a homework asignment. I'll have to make a trip to the library for Titles, but it's just as well. I should have sourcenames for stuff like this anyway.
 
 
Farmerman,
....How silly of me, talking library while sittng in front of a computor. These should getyou started:

...."Before the Mayflower"-Lerone Jr. Bennett
...."Africa And The Discovery Of America"-Leo Werner
...."They Came Before Columbus"-Ivon Von Sertima

....You can go to Amazon, and read synopsis' on these books, and other's on the suject.
....(I know, you thought I was bluffin' didn't you?   )
 
 
I think you miss FM's point, Boo... had there been significant settlement in the "new" world by Africans, there would be genetic evidence--but there is none. Were the Africans indeed visiting the western hemisphere, it must have been roughly equivalent to Viking visits--nothing permanent, and nothing significant.
 
 
Check the synopsis' of the books
 
 
 
...."Before the Mayflower"-Lerone Jr. Bennett
...."Africa And The Discovery Of America"-Leo Werner
...."They Came Before Columbus"-Ivon Von Sertima

....You can go to Amazon, and read synopsis' on these books, and other's on the suject.
....(I know, you thought I was bluffin' didn't you?   )
 

 Excerpt from 'Before the Mayflower: The African-American Century' 

 A History of Native American and African Relations from 1502 to 1900 

 
Khpera, Saafu. "They Came Before Columbus." New African, (392):16-20. January 2001. Stone carvings and terracotta figures found in South America indicate that Africans may have arrived before Columbus. Books by Ivan Van Sertima and Alexander von Wuthenau are cited.
 
 Source 
 
 
Thanks for those posts Walter. Ill have to try to find an AAFS article re genetic STR markers in Samerican populations from a stat study done in 2001 or 2. It was about those little pieces of genetic junk that affix themselves in a genome through millenia of incorporating small but key mutations within a population. These mutations get passed on in the mDNA as populations mix and it can be a powerful tool to demonstrate the mobility of a society or two.
Im a popultion dynamics nut and have only heard the "African visitation" hypothesis in the more popular written stuff. I just bought a new pub about mineral provinces in the light of Continental Drift. That thing cost me 350 clams and my book budget is tapped out for a month or more. So Ill have to search the library and read.
Howevr booman, I caution you to keep a skeptical eye on just about anythging re population theories. Like those Olmec "rollerheads", have more in common withother mesoamerican artifacts than they do with African. Similarity of artifacts can often be misinterpreted because the author wants to see something thats not really there.

Maybe Im leaning on genetics too much but its been a powerful tool to show how our planet was populatedand how populations mixed.
 
 
Farmerman,
....First of all, I see you thank Walter for posting the title.   but that's okay, as long as you got them. Perhaps my post didn't show up on your screen.
....And now; If you'll remember, my original statement was simply, "before the Vikings there were the Africans" Apparently, this doesn't sit too well with you. You've been traveling on the world's largest river* every since. if you read the synopsis' of these books, It might help you to belive it, after you learn that two of these authors are caucasion. :wink:

.......*I won't reveal the continent this river ("de" Nile) is on I don't want To upset you.

How you doin' Ol' Chap? I remember you from two years ago, when I was just Booman.  
 
 
Booman, yes I thanked Walter because he posted the articles of which you referred. Im a "data" guy, and the evidence for Africans in the New World is not robust enough IMHO to be considered a slam dunk. I know that its been discussed around the campfires.
The vikings left unquestionable evidence in the form of an entire settlement built in Viking style. They also left the sagas. Forensically they are in safe waters.
Now, as far as an African adventure, why does it make any difference as to what race the authors are ?
Can we point to ant clearly African style ARTIFACTS or cultural evidence that is not built of the same cloth that van Deniken used to create his ripping yarns of alien runways at Cuzco.
Im not dead set against any hypothesis turned theory if <IF, there is a dram of evidence worth consideration. Since I have not read but some of the sections that Walter posted,Im not easily stirred by stylistic comparisons. Remember the Indo European symbol the swastika? how many civilizations separated by vast geography share this symbol? its an interesting bit of speculation.

Im not convinced that Olmec heads are African influenced. If this were the case why didnt they have the wheel? African civilizations had the wheel before Meso Americans. In fact, I believe that it was after Columbus that the wheel, as a conveyance, was used
To the Maya, a wheel was a calendar made of stone..
I brought up the DNA evidence because DNA is busting some really big evolution and populational debates right in the chops.
We know that "out of Africa" occured in 2 major waves.and one minor for another species or two.
We know the first wave headed east and around to China. We know the second went east and North, then west.

Monte Verde site has shown some artifacts that are pre clovis but have a typical paleo shape, with deep fluted points and hand axes. Africans were already into bronze by the time they speculate that there was African contact. But, they apparently left no garbage or anything.
Ill be away for a day or more and I promise to check in because if you have any data or evidence from the titles youve posted, Im eager to learn, I know that when we write on these boards, becauese its so declarative and we arent talking over a back fence, the writing sounds slightly offensive. I dont mean to sound that way, I truly am interested and Im not trying to be a "self proclaimed expert" on this stuff. Its just a hobby and I do wish to learn more. However, discount my brusque astyle and lets prepare to discuss honest to goodness, rigorously tested data. Or at least data that has some buzz built about it in scholarly work. I wish I had time to send acquiunk a PM but I gotta catch a plane to Tennessee
 
 
Farmerman, I agree with just about everything in your most recent post, above. Just one thing, however. I see the wheel as a red herring in this situation. The Mesoamericans understood the use of the wheel as a motive aid. Tiny wheels that turn were used on children's toys. (For a discussion of this, see Jared Diamond, Guns, Germs and Steel.) The one overwhelming reason why they never made, say, carriages or war chariots with wheels is that they had no use for the wheel in this capacity. They had no draft animals for pulling such conveyances. On the mountain roads which they used, pack animals (the llama in the Andes, dogs in Mexico) or human slaves with back-packs were far more efficient means of transportation. They undoubtedly used the principle of the wheel in moving the large slabs of stone in building their pyramids; i.e., they must have been rolled on logs or some similar method. We tend to focus on the wheel only because it is so standard a device in Eurasian societies that we assume its use must be more or less universal. You need a horse, a mule, a water buffalo for the wheel to be useful. In the type of irrigated farming they did, even the wheel-barrow, pushed by humans, would not have been too terribly useful.

(Edited once for typos)
 
 
Farmerman,
....I don't know how to do the link thing. I was thinking if I gave you the titles of the books, and told you to go to Amazon.com, you would be able to get there your self...My bad.... As for the rest of it, I understand where you are coming, believe me I do. I won't bother you about it anymore, in the name of peace.
 
 
